South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5244.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 6, Chapter 11, Title 50 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 50-11-1055.  Upon proper application to the department, a deer depredation permit shall be issued by the department from January second through September fourteenth. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----